Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1107.02
Director of Administrative Services; settlement of accounts; powers.

The Director of Administrative Services, whenever he may think it necessary to the proper settlement of any account, may examine the parties, witnesses or others, on oath or affirmation, touching any matter material to be known in the settlement of such account.

R.S.1866, c. 4, § 7, p. 23;

R.S.1913, § 5549;

C.S.1922, § 4851;

C.S.1929, § 84-307;

R.S.1943, § 84-307;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 84-307.

Under former law, Auditor of Public Accounts was authorized to inquire of parties interested and to call and examine witnesses with respect to facts before issuance of warrant. Fischer v. Marsh, 113 Neb. 153, 202 N.W. 422 (1925).